District of Columbia statutes.
1-623.46

Transfer of authority.

In accordance with § 1-202.04(e), the disability compensation functions previously exercised by the United States Secretary of Labor relating to the processing of claims by injured employees of the District of Columbia are transferred to the Mayor on the date that this chapter becomes effective as provided in § 1-636.02.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2346, 25 DCR 5740

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-624.46.
1973 Ed., § 1-353.46.

Editor's Notes

Application of 1980 amendments to subchapter: Section 3 of the Act of August 7, 1980, D.C. Law 3-81, provided that the amendments made throughout this subchapter by §§ 2(p) through (dd) of that Act shall not apply to applications for disability compensation filed between May 3, 1979, and August 16, 1979, and on February 19, 1980.